Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 6. Weight Certificates

§ 2741.
Weight certificate; required entries.

The weight certificate shall be typed, made out in ink or other indelible substance, and shall state the date of issuance; the kind of property, produce, commodity, or article weighed; the name of the declared owner or agent of the owner or of the consignee of the material weighed; the accurate weight of the material weighed; the means by which the material was being transported at the time it was weighed; and such other available information as may be necessary to distinguish or identify the property, produce, commodity, or article from others of like kind.
The weight certificate, when so made and properly signed, shall be prima facie evidence of the accuracy of the weights shown.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 42, eff. April 14, 1967.

§ 2742.
Execution; requirements.

A licensed public weighmaster shall not enter on a weight certificate issued by him or her any weight values but such as he or she has personally determined, and he or she shall make no entries on a weight certificate issued by some other person.
A weight certificate shall be so prepared as to show clearly that weight or weights were actually determined.
If the certificate form provides for the entry of gross, tare, and net weights, in any case in which only the gross, the tare, or the net weight is determined by the weighmaster, he or she shall strike through or otherwise cancel the printed entries for the weights not determined or computed.
If gross and tare weights are shown on a weight certificate and both of these were not determined on the same scale and on the day for which the certificate is dated, the weighmaster shall identify on the certificate the scale used for determining each such weight and the date of each such determination.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 43, eff. April 14, 1967.

§ 2743.
Scale used; type; test.

When making a weight determination as provided by this chapter, a licensed public weighmaster shall use a weighing device that is of a type suitable for the weighing of the amount and kind of material to be weighed and that has been tested and approved for use by the Secretary or inspector during the year of test or the preceding calendar year and since has not been condemned.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 44, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 2744.
Capacity; platform size; one-draft weighing.

A licensed public weighmaster shall not use any scale to weigh a load the value of which exceeds the nominal or rated capacity of the scale. When the gross or tare weight of any vehicle or combination of vehicles is to be determined, the weighing shall be performed upon a scale having a platform of sufficient size to accommodate such vehicle or combination of vehicles fully, completely, and as one entire unit. If a combination of vehicles must be broken up into separate units in order to be weighed as prescribed in this section, each such separate unit shall be entirely disconnected before weighing and a separate weight certificate shall be issued for each such separate unit.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 45, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 28.

§ 2745.
Copies of weight certificates.

A licensed public weighmaster shall keep and preserve for at least one year, or for such longer period as may be specified in the regulations authorized to be issued for the enforcement of this chapter, a legible carbon copy of each weight certificate issued by him or her, which copies shall be open at all reasonable times for inspection by any weights and measures officer of this State.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 46, eff. April 14, 1967.

§ 2746.
Bulk delivery.

When not weighed by a “public licensed weighmaster,” each delivery of a commodity, product, or merchandise in bulk form, including grain, feed, fertilizer, cement, lime, and hay when sold by weight, and delivered by vehicle, the provisions under sections 2741-2745 of this title inclusive shall govern.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 40, eff. April 14, 1967.

§ 2747.
Reciprocal acceptance of weight certificates.

Whenever in any other state that licenses public weighmasters, there is statutory authority for the recognition and acceptance of the weight certificates issued by licensed weighmasters of this State, the Secretary may recognize and accept the weight certificates of that other state.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 47, eff. April 14, 1967 amended

1991, No. 227

, (Adj. Sess.), § 7.